Nebraska, session 109, LB1177.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1177 LB1177
2026 2026
Section 1. The Legislature finds that:
(1) The Child Care Cash Fund is a permanent tool to reinforce the
state's workforce, strengthen economic growth, and support families
through sustained investment in the state's child care system. Child care
is foundational economic infrastructure and that long-term, reliable
funding is essential to the state's ability to attract, retain, and
support a stable workforce;
(2) Access to the child care subsidy is a key driver of workforce
participation, family stability, and positive outcomes for children
across Nebraska; and
(3) The Child Care Cash Fund shall be primarily dedicated to (a)
preserving access to the child care subsidy for eligible working
families, (b) supporting continuity and stability in child care for young
children, and (c) ensuring the long-term viability of child care
providers in both urban and rural communities.
Sec. 2. (1) The Child Care Cash Fund is created and shall be
administered by the Department of Health and Human Services and shall
consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature from the General Fund,
private gifts, grants, or donations for the purposes of the fund, and
other funds as directed by the Legislature. Any money in the Child Care
Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Child Care Cash Fund shall be used for the child care
subsidy program including: (a) Ensuring continuity of care for families;
(b) making timely payments to child care providers; (c) supporting
reimbursement rates sufficient to promote provider stability and access
to care; (d) administrative costs necessary to operate the child care
subsidy program; (e) quality improvement and workforce supports for child
care providers; and (f) other child care uses as authorized by the
Legislature.
-2-

LB1177 LB1177
2026 2026
(3) The fund shall not be used to supplant the state's required
match for the child care subsidy.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate XXX from the
Child Care Cash Fund annually for the purposes described in this section.
(5) The department shall electronically submit an annual report to
the Legislature that includes: (a) Amounts credited to, and expended
from, the Child Care Cash Fund; (b) the monthly number of families and
children served by the child care subsidy by income eligibility level and
eligibility reason; (c) the number of child care subsidy applications
received, accepted, and denied per month; (d) for denied applications,
the reason for denial; and (e) the number of pending child care subsidy
applications per month.
-3-